Maryland, session 2026, HB0011.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
2–315.
(a) This section applies only in Anne Arundel County.
(c) (1) The Sheriff shall appoint deputies at a salary as provided by the County
Council of Anne Arundel County.
(2) The Sheriff may appoint a chief deputy who shall serve at the pleasure
of the Sheriff.
(3) THE SHERIFF SHALL MAY APPOINT THREE MAJORS WHO SHALL
SERVE AT THE PLEASURE OF THE SHERIFF AT A SALARY AS PROVIDED BY THE
COUNTY COUNCIL OF ANNE ARUNDEL COUNTY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.